Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.53, is amended to read: 121A.53 REPORT TO COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION. Subdivision 1. Exclusions and expulsions; student withdrawals; physical assaults. Consistent with subdivision 2, the school board must report through the department electronic reporting system each exclusion or expulsion,new text begin each fight involving pupils that is witnessed by a district employee,new text end each physical assault of a district employee by a pupil, and each pupil withdrawal agreement within 30 days of the effective date of the dismissal action, pupil withdrawal, or assault, to the commissioner of education. This report must include a statement of nonexclusionary disciplinary practices, or other sanction, intervention, or resolution in response to the assault given the pupil and the reason for, the effective date, and the duration of the exclusion or expulsion or other sanction, intervention, or resolution. The report must also include the pupil's age, grade, gender, race, and special education status. Subd. 2. Report. (a) The school board must include state student identification numbers of affected pupils on all dismissal and other disciplinary reports required by the department. The department must report annually to the commissioner summary data on the number of dismissalsnew text begin , fights involving pupils witnessed by a district employee,new text end and physical assaults of district employees by a student by age, grade, gender, race, and special education status of the affected pupils. All dismissal and other disciplinary reports must be submitted through the department electronic reporting system. (b) The commissioner must aggregate the district data reported under this section and include the aggregated data, including aggregated data on physical assaults of a district employee by a student, in the annual school performance reports under section 120B.36. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fighting witnessed by a district employee. new text end new text begin A school district employee who witnesses fighting between pupils must report the incident to the building administrator responsible for discipline and must file a police report. The school board must report the incident to the department according to this section and verify that a police report was filed by the district employee who witnessed the fight. new text end